Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-1926
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the
Children's Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure Act:

(1) Care means
the provision of room and board and the exercise of concern and responsibility
for the safety and welfare of children on a twenty-four-hour-per-day basis
in settings that serve as the out-of-home placement for children;

(2) Child means
a minor less than nineteen years of age;

(3) Child-placing agency means any person
other than the parent or legal guardian of a child that receives the child
for placement and places or arranges for the placement of a child in a foster
family home, adoptive home, residential child-caring agency, or independent
living;

(4) Department means the Division of Public Health of the Department
of Health and Human Services;

(5) Director means the Director of Public
Health of the Division of Public Health;

(6) Person includes bodies politic and corporate,
societies, communities, the public generally, individuals, partnerships, limited
liability companies, joint-stock companies, and associations; and

(7) Residential
child-caring agency means a person that provides care for four or more children
and that is not a foster family home as defined in section 71-1901.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 3.